District of Columbia statutes.
15-319

Execution of final decree after death; other appropriate proceedings.

When a party to an action dies after final decree, the court may order execution of the decree as if death had not occurred, or the court, after motion and hearing, may order the decree revived against the proper representatives of the deceased party, or make such other order or direct such other proceedings as seems best calculated to advance the purposes of justice. The heir or other proper representative may appear at any time before execution of the decree and be admitted as a party to the action, on such terms as the court prescribes, and such further proceeding may be had as may be appropriate to the merits of the cause.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-319.
1973 Ed., § 15-319.